Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB528.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Curriculum" means the content and plan for instruction, including
materials, instructional programs, texts, lesson plans, and assessments
needed to help students develop critical skills, knowledge, and meet or
exceed proficiency in required academic standards;
(b) "Educator preparation program" means a program approved by the
Education Professional Standards Board that prepares individuals for
licensure as teachers, school leaders, or other school or district
administrators;
(c) "Reading intervention" means curriculum, activities, and evidence-based
strategies used to remediate reading deficiencies, including but not limited
to individual instruction, small groups, multisensory approaches, tutoring,
mentoring, and the use of technology that targets specific reading skills and
abilities; and
(d) "Three-cueing system" means any model of teaching students to read based
on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues, which may also be
known as "MSV."
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish an approved list of
reading curriculum that is scientifically researched and evidence-based that may
be used by schools to meet the requirements of subsection (3)(b) of this section
and that shall not include instructional strategies that employ the three-cueing
system of reading.
(3) (a) A public school district shall not use any curriculum, reading intervention,
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
or program of instruction that utilizes the three-cueing system of teaching
students to read.
(b) Each public school district shall:
1. Ensure that all curriculum, reading interventions, and programs of
instruction utilized to teach students to read are high-quality, fully
aligned to state content standards, and based on literacy strategies that
are scientifically researched with proven results in teaching phonemic
awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension; and
2. Ensure that no school in the district is utilizing a three-cueing system
of teaching students to read.
(4) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, if the Kentucky Board of Education
determines that a public school district has violated subsection (3) of this section,
the board shall notify the public school district of the violation.
(5) The department, the Educational Professional Standards Board, educational
cooperatives, special education cooperatives, early childhood regional training
centers, and local school districts are prohibited from providing or utilizing any
professional development that uses a three-cueing system of teaching students to
read.
(6) The Education Professional Standards Board shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish criteria for reading
curriculum for each state-approved educator preparation program.
Section 2. KRS 164.306 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Beginning in the 2022-2023 school year, ]Postsecondary institutions offering
teacher preparation programs for interdisciplinary early childhood education or
elementary regular education shall include evidence-based reading instructional
programming related to reading instruction in the areas of phonemic awareness,
phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension and on:
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
(a) The administration of specific assessment processes and programs used to
identify student strengths and needs and that are determined by the
Department of Education to be reliable and valid;
(b) The use of assessment data for designing instruction and interventions;
(c) Progress monitoring of student performance; and
(d) Instructional strategies that address students' individual differences.
(2) Postsecondary institutions offering teacher preparation programs shall:
(a) Provide instruction on how to teach reading and language arts using
scientifically researched and evidence-based reading instruction and
reading intervention programs as defined in Section 1 of this Act;
(b) Prohibit instruction on teaching reading and language arts that
incorporates a three-cueing system as defined in Section 1 of this Act; and
(c) Align to the academic standards established by the Department of
Education, and the approved list of reading curriculum and instructional
materials that are utilized by local districts under Section 1 of this Act.
(3)[(2)] [By January 1, 2024, ]The Education Professional Standards Board shall
develop and maintain a list of approved teacher preparation tests that are
determined by the board to be an effective evaluation of reading instruction
knowledge and skills.
(4)[(3)] [Beginning in the 2024-2025 school year, ]All new teachers seeking
certification in interdisciplinary early childhood education or elementary education
shall successfully pass an approved teacher preparation test that includes an
evaluation of reading instruction knowledge and skills.
(5)[(4)] The Education Professional Standards Board shall report program data to an
external evaluator for analysis of postsecondary teacher preparation programs for
interdisciplinary early childhood education or elementary regular education for the
goal of increasing the success of new teacher candidates in demonstrating reading
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
instruction knowledge and skills.
Section 3. KRS 161.028 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Education Professional Standards Board is recognized to be a public body
corporate and politic and an agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth, in
the performance of essential governmental functions. The Education Professional
Standards Board has the authority and responsibility to:
(a) Establish standards and requirements for obtaining and maintaining a teaching
certificate;
(b) Set standards for, approve, and evaluate college, university, and school district
programs for the preparation of teachers and other professional school
personnel. College or university programs may be approved by the board for a
college or university with regional institutional level accreditation or national
institutional level accreditation that is recognized by the United States
Department of Education and is eligible to receive federal funding under 20
U.S.C. secs. 1061 to 1063. Program standards shall reflect national standards
and shall address, at a minimum, the following:
1. The alignment of programs with the state's core content for assessment
as defined in KRS 158.6457;
2. Research-based classroom practices, including effective classroom
management techniques;
3. Emphasis on subject matter competency of teacher education students;
4. Methodologies to meet diverse educational needs of all students;
5. The consistency and quality of classroom and field experiences,
including early practicums and student teaching experiences;
6. The amount of college-wide or university-wide involvement and support
during the preparation as well as the induction of new teachers;
7. The diversity of faculty;
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
8. The effectiveness of partnerships with local school districts; and
9. The performance of graduates on various measures as determined by the
board;
(c) Include in the standards established for programs for the preparation of
teachers under subsection (1)(b) of this section the requirement that
programs:
1. Shall provide instruction on how to teach reading and language arts
using scientifically researched and evidence-based reading instruction
and reading intervention programs as defined in Section 1 of this Act;
and
2. Shall not provide instruction on teaching reading and language arts
that incorporates a three-cueing system as defined in Section 1 of this
Act;
(d) Conduct an annual review of diversity in teacher preparation programs;
(e)[(d)] Provide assistance to universities and colleges in addressing diversity,
which may include researching successful strategies and disseminating the
information, encouraging the development of nontraditional avenues of
recruitment and providing incentives, waiving administrative regulations
when needed, and other assistance as deemed necessary;
(f)[(e)] Discontinue approval of programs that do not meet standards or whose
graduates do not perform according to criteria set by the board;
(g)[(f)] Issue, renew, revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose
probationary or supervisory conditions upon; issue a written reprimand or
admonishment; or any combination of actions regarding any certificate;
(h)[(g)] Develop specific guidelines to follow upon receipt of an allegation of
sexual misconduct by an employee certified by the Education Professional
Standards Board. The guidelines shall include investigation, inquiry, and
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
hearing procedures which ensure the process does not revictimize the alleged
victim or cause harm if an employee is falsely accused;
(i)[(h)] Receive, along with investigators hired by the Education Professional
Standards Board, training on the dynamics of sexual misconduct of
professionals, including the nature of this abuse of authority, characteristics of
the offender, the impact on the victim, the possibility and the impact of false
accusations, investigative procedures in sex offense cases, and effective
intervention with victims and offenders;
(j)[(i)] Recommend to the Kentucky Board of Education the essential data
elements relating to teacher preparation and certification, teacher supply and
demand, teacher attrition, teacher diversity, and employment trends to be
included in a state comprehensive data and information system and
periodically report data to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on
Education;
(k)[(j)] Submit reports to the Governor and the Legislative Research
Commission and inform the public on the status of teaching in Kentucky;
(l)[(k)] Devise a credentialing system that provides alternative routes to gaining
certification and greater flexibility in staffing local schools while maintaining
standards for teacher competence;
(m)[(l)] Develop a professional code of ethics;
(n)[(m)] Charge reasonable fees for the issuance, reissuance, and renewal of
certificates that are established by administrative regulation. The proceeds
shall be used to meet a portion of the costs of the issuance, reissuance, and
renewal of certificates, and the costs associated with disciplinary action
against a certificate holder under KRS 161.120;
(o)[(n)] Waive a requirement that may be established in an administrative
regulation promulgated by the board. A request for a waiver shall be
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
submitted to the board, in writing, by an applicant for certification, a
postsecondary institution, or a superintendent of a local school district, with
appropriate justification for the waiver. The board may approve the request if
the person or institution seeking the waiver has demonstrated extraordinary
circumstances justifying the waiver. Any waiver granted under this subsection
shall be subject to revocation if the person or institution falsifies information
or subsequently fails to meet the intent of the waiver;
(p)[(o)] Promote the development of one (1) or more innovative, nontraditional
or alternative administrator or teacher preparation programs through public or
private colleges or universities, private contractors, the Department of
Education, or the Kentucky Commonwealth Virtual University and waive
administrative regulations if needed in order to implement the program;
(q)[(p)] Grant approval, if appropriate, of a university's request for an alternative
program that enrolls an administrator candidate in a postbaccalaureate
administrator preparation program concurrently with employment as an
assistant principal, principal, assistant superintendent, or superintendent in a
local school district. An administrator candidate in the alternative program
shall be granted a temporary provisional certificate and shall be a candidate in
the Kentucky Principal Internship Program, notwithstanding provisions of
KRS 161.030, or the Superintendent's Assessment process, notwithstanding
provisions of KRS 156.111, as appropriate. The temporary certificate shall be
valid for a maximum of two (2) years, and shall be contingent upon the
candidate's continued enrollment in the preparation program and compliance
with all requirements established by the board. A professional certificate shall
be issued upon the candidate's successful completion of the program,
internship requirements, and assessments as required by the board;
(r)[(q)] Employ consultants as needed;
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
(s)[(r)] Enter into contracts. Disbursements to professional educators who
receive less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in compensation per fiscal
year from the board for serving on an assessment validation panel or as a test
scorer or proctor shall not be subject to KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725;
(t)[(s)] Sponsor studies, conduct research, conduct conferences, and publish
information as appropriate; and
(u)[(t)] Issue orders as necessary in any administrative action before the board.
(2) (a) The board shall be composed of seventeen (17) members. The secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet and the president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio voting
members. The Governor shall make the following fifteen (15) appointments:
1. Nine (9) members who shall be teachers representative of elementary,
middle or junior high, secondary, special education, and secondary
vocational classrooms;
2. Two (2) members who shall be school administrators, one (1) of whom
shall be a school principal;
3. One (1) member representative of local boards of education; and
4. Three (3) members representative of postsecondary institutions, two (2)
of whom shall be deans of colleges of education at public universities
and one (1) of whom shall be the chief academic officer of an
independent not-for-profit college or university.
(b) The members appointed by the Governor shall be confirmed by the Senate
under KRS 11.160. If the General Assembly is not in session at the time of the
appointment, persons appointed shall serve prior to confirmation, but the
Governor shall seek the consent of the Senate at the next regular session or at
an intervening extraordinary session if the matter is included in the call of the
General Assembly.
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1773
(c) Each appointed member shall serve a three (3) year term. A vacancy on the
board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment within
sixty (60) days after it occurs. A member shall continue to serve until his or
her successor is named. Any member who, through change of employment
status or residence, or for other reasons, no longer meets the criteria for the
position to which he or she was appointed shall no longer be eligible to serve
in that position.
(d) Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be permitted
to attend board meetings and perform other board business without loss of
income or other benefits.
(e) A state agency or any political subdivision of the state, including a school
district, required to hire a substitute for a member of the board who is absent
from the member's place of employment while performing board business
shall be reimbursed by the board for the actual amount of any costs incurred.
(f) A chairman shall be elected by and from the membership. A member shall be
eligible to serve no more than three (3) one (1) year terms in succession as
chairman. Regular meetings shall be held at least semiannually on call of the
chairman.
(g) The commissioner of education shall serve as executive secretary to the board
and may designate staff to facilitate his or her duties.
(h) To carry out the functions relating to its duties and responsibilities, the board
is empowered to receive donations and grants of funds; to appoint consultants
as needed; and to sponsor studies, conduct conferences, and publish
information.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:33 PM Jacketed